Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Article 4. Insurance

Separate and distinct insurance schemes

are provided for by this article and chapter 21 of title 26, relating to credit life and disability insurance, and the provisions of this article and chapter 21 cannot be properly combined nor can selective provisions from each be merged into an insurance scheme different from either. Foremost Life Ins. Co. v. Langdon, 633 P.2d 938,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1981).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

17 Am. Jur. 2d Consumer and Borrower Protection §§ 364 to 379.

21 C.J.S. Credit Reporting Agencies; Consumer Protection § 61.